Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-256
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Student Discipline Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Long-term suspension means the exclusion of a student from attendance in all schools within the system for a period exceeding five school days but less than twenty school days;

(2) Expulsion means exclusion from attendance in all schools within the system in accordance with section 79-283;

(3) Mandatory reassignment means the involuntary transfer of a student to another school; and

(4) Short-term suspension means the exclusion of a student from attendance in all schools within the system for a period not to exceed five school days.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 10;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 15;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,179;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 60;

Laws 1997, LB 232, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 62.